Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.526

Appellate review by supreme court or court of appeals.

An aggrieved party may secure appellate review of any final judgment of the superior court under this chapter by the supreme court or the court of appeals. The review shall be secured in the manner provided by law for review of superior court decisions in other civil cases.

[ 1988 c 288 s 505; 1988 c 202 s 35; 1971 c 81 s 87; 1959 c 234 s 14. Formerly RCW 34.04.140.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1988 c 202 s 35, effective June 9, 1988, and by 1988 c 288 s 505, effective July 1, 1989, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.